Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2251YH (2) 91 th/ns H.F. 257 Section 1. Section 321I.10, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. A county shall not charge a fee to 3 operate a registered all-terrain vehicle or off-road utility 4 vehicle on secondary roads within the county. 5